District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1103.02

Voluntary severance incentive program.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 404, 43 DCR 4962
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 147, 47 DCR 520
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-263.2.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.